District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.142

Repealed

Effect of issuance of certificate of reincorporation or incorporation.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 237, ch. 269, § 142
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 574, Pub. L. 85-254, § 34
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.142.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.43.
1973 Ed., § 29-952a.